Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1403
Foreman; appointment.

When the grand jury shall be impaneled the court shall appoint one of the number foreman.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 394, p. 814;

R.S.1913, § 9033;

C.S.1922, § 10057;

C.S.1929, § 29-1403;

R.S.1943, § 29-1403.